Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Title Insurance

Cross references. —

For definition of “title insurance,” see §

26-5-109

.

As to limit of risk of title insurer, see §

26-5-110

.

As to unearned premium reserve of title insurance, see §

26-6-105

.

As to special investments by title insurer, see §

26-7-115

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 17; 528 to 530; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1537, 1538.

Measure, extent or amount of recovery on policy of title insurance, 60 ALR2d 972.

Construction of clause in title insurance policy excepting defects resulting from the rights of parties in possession, 94 ALR3d 1188.

Defect in, or condition of, adjacent land or way as within coverage of title insurance policy, 8 ALR4th 1246.

Misrepresentation or concealment by insured or agent avoiding liability by title insurer, 17 ALR4th 1077.

Defects affecting marketability of title within meaning of title insurance policy, 18 ALR4th 1311.

Title insurance company's rights in title information, 38 ALR4th 968.

Title insurer's negligent failure to discover and disclose defect as basis for liability in tort, 19 ALR5th 786.

44 C.J.S. Insurance § 19; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1061 to 1084.

§ 26-23-301.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Title Insurance Act”.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-302.
Applicability of article; construction with other laws.

This article applies to all title insurers, title insurance rating organizations, title agents, applicants for title insurance, title insurance policyholders, and all persons engaged in title insurance transactions in this state.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this article, and except where the context otherwise requires, all provisions of this code [title 26] applying to insurance and insurance companies generally apply to title insurance and title insurance companies.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the practice of law by any person who is not admitted to practice law in this state nor shall it be construed to authorize the commissioner to regulate the practice of law.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-303.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Alien title insurer” means any title insurer incorporated or organized under the laws of any foreign nation or any province or territory thereof;

“Applicant” means a person, whether or not a prospective insured, who applies to a title insurer or title agent for a title insurance policy and who, at the time of the application, is not a title agent;

“Approved attorney” means an attorney at law who is not an agent or employee of a title insurer and whose certification as to status of title a title insurer is willing to accept as the basis for issuance of its title insurance policy;

“Associate” means any:

Business organized for profit in which a producer of title business is a director, officer, partner, employee or owner of five percent (5%) or more of the equity capital thereof;

Employee of a producer of title business;

Franchisor or franchisee of a producer of title business;

Spouse, parent or child of a producer of title business who is a natural person;

Person, other than a natural person, that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a producer of title business; or

Person with whom a producer of title business or any associate of such producer has any agreement, arrangement or understanding, or pursues any course of conduct, the purpose or substantial effect of which is to evade the provisions of this article.

“Charge” means any fee billed by a title agent or title insurer or both for the performance of services, other than fees that fall within the definition of premium in paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section and includes but is not limited to fees for document preparation, fees for the handling of escrows, settlements or closings and fees for services commenced but not completed. “Charge” does not include fees collected by a title insurer or title agent in an escrow, settlement or closing when the fees are limited to the amount billed for services rendered by an entity independent of the title insurer or title agent;

“Controlled business” means any portion of a title insurer’s or title agent’s business of title insurance in this state, referred to it by any producer of title business or by any associate of such producer, if the producer of title business, the associate, or both, have a financial interest in the title insurer or title agent to which business is referred;

“Domestic title insurer” means a title insurer organized under the laws of this state;

“Escrow, settlement or closing fee” means the consideration for supervising the actual execution, delivery or recording of transfer and lien documents and for disbursing funds;

“Financial interest” means any interest that entitles the holder in any manner to five percent (5%) or more of the net profits or net worth of the entity in which the interest is held;

“Foreign title insurer” means any title insurer organized under the laws of any other state of the United States, the District of Columbia or any other jurisdiction of the United States;

“Gross operating revenue” means all premiums received by a title insurer or title agent;

“Net retained liability” means the total liability retained by a title insurer for a single risk, after taking into account the deduction for ceded liability, if any;

“Person” means any natural person, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation, trust or other legal entity;

“Premium” means fees for:

Issuing a title insurance policy, including any service charge administration fee for the issuance of a title insurance policy;

Abstracting, searching and examining title when conducted or performed in contemplation of or in conjunction with the issuance of a title insurance policy;

Preparing or issuing preliminary reports, property profiles, commitments, binders or like products;

Assuming liability under a contract of reinsurance.

“Producer of title business” or “producer” means any person, including any officer, director or owner of five percent (5%) or more of the equity or capital of any person engaged in this state in the trade, business, occupation or profession of:

Buying or selling interests in real property;

Making loans secured by interests in real property; or

Acting as broker, agent, representative or attorney of a person who buys or sells any interest in real property or who lends or borrows money with such interest as security.

“Refer” means to direct or cause to be directed or to exercise any power or influence over the direction of title insurance business, whether or not the consent or approval of any other person is sought or obtained with respect to the referral;

“Report”, subject to the stated exceptions set forth therein, issued prior to the issuance of a policy, means a “preliminary report”, “commitment”, or “binder” and constitutes a statement of the terms and conditions upon which the insurer is willing to issue its policy but is not a title policy. Neither a title policy nor a report issued prior to the issuance of a title insurance policy is an abstract of title;

“Single risk” means the insured amount of any title insurance policy, except that if two (2) or more title insurance policies are issued simultaneously covering different estates in the same real property, “single risk” means the sum of the insured amounts of all such title insurance policies. Any title insurance policy insuring a mortgage interest a claim payment under which reduces the insured amount of a fee or leasehold title insurance policy shall be excluded in computing the amount of a single risk to the extent that the insured amount of the mortgagee title insurance policy does not exceed the insured amount of the fee or leasehold title insurance policy;

“Title agent” or “agent” means any person authorized in writing by a title insurer to do any of the following but does not include approved attorneys, officers or employees of a title insurer:

Solicit title insurance business;

Collect premiums;

Determine insurability in accordance with underwriting rules and standards prescribed by the title insurer; or

Issue policies of the title insurer.

“Title insurance business” or “business of title insurance” means:

Issuing as insurer or offering to issue as insurer a title insurance policy;

Transacting or proposing to transact by a title insurer or title agent any of the following activities when conducted or performed in contemplation of the issuance of a title insurance policy:

Soliciting or negotiating the issuance of a title insurance policy;

Guaranteeing, warranting or otherwise insuring the correctness of title searches;

Handling of escrows, settlements or closings;

Execution of title insurance policies;

Effecting contracts of reinsurance;

Abstracting, searching or examining titles; or

Doing or proposing to do any business in substance equivalent to any of the businesses specified in subdivisions (I) through (VI) of this subparagraph in a manner designed to evade the provisions of this article.

“Title insurance policy” or “policy” means a contract wherein, subject to the stated terms and conditions, a title insurer insures, guarantees or indemnifies owners of real or personal property or the holders of liens or encumbrances thereon or others interested therein against loss or damage suffered by reason of:

Defects in, adverse claims, liens or encumbrances in the title to the stated property;

Unmarketability of the title to the stated property;

Guaranteeing, warranting or otherwise insuring by a title insurance company the correctness of searches relating to the title to property;

Defects in the authorization, execution or delivery of an encumbrance upon such property;

The insuring by a title insurance company the validity and enforceability of evidences of indebtedness secured by an encumbrance upon the title or interest in such property;

The invalidity, unenforceability or loss of priority of an insured mortgage resulting from a change in rate of interest or principal balance, or both, which change is in accordance with the provisions of the insured mortgage.

“Title insurer” or “insurer” means a company organized under laws of this state for the purpose of transacting as insurer the business of title insurance and any foreign or alien title insurer engaged in this state in the business of title insurance as insurer;

“Title plant” means a set of records in which an entry has been made of documents or matters imparting constructive notice under the law of matters affecting title to real property or any interest therein or encumbrance thereon, which have been filed or recorded in the jurisdiction for which the title plant is maintained.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Title insurance. —

In a title
insurance dispute, a limited liability partnership was an insured
because it automatically took ownership of the property when it
converted
to a Wyoming limited liability partnership, amended its
certificate
of limited partnership to change its name, and withdrew
its registration
as a Colorado limited liability limited partnership.
The ordinary
meaning of a transfer by operation of law was one
that
did not involve
an exchange of money or other equivalent consideration. N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2015 WY 150, 362 P.3d 341,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2015).

Tort liability. —

Courts cannot premise a title insurer's tort liability on the mere fact of issuance of a title insurance commitment as defined by paragraph (a)(xvii). Hulse v. First Am. Title Co., 2001 WY 95, 33 P.3d 122,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Nov. 20, 2001).

Tort liability. —

Issuance of title commitments provided no basis for negligence claims against a title insurer because its report was not an abstract of title and did not give rise to an abstractor's duty of care.
Sonnett v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2013 WY 106, 309 P.3d 799,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 26-23-304.
Corporate form required.

No person other than a domestic, foreign or alien title insurer organized on the stock plan and licensed under this code [title 26] shall transact title insurance business as an insurer in this state.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-305.
Title insurers; authorized activities.

Each title insurer may:

Engage in the title insurance business in this state if licensed to do so by the commissioner;

Subject to the limitations of this article, provide any other service related or incidental to the sale and transfer of property; or

Conduct its operations on a direct basis through a branch office located within the state without using a title agent.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-23-306.
Limitations on powers.

An insurer that transacts any class or kind of insurance other than title insurance is not eligible for a license to transact the business of title insurance in this state, nor for the renewal thereof, nor shall title insurance be transacted, underwritten or issued by any insurer transacting or licensed to transact any other kind of insurance.

An insurer shall not engage in the business of guaranteeing payment of the principal or the interest of bonds or mortgages.

An insurer shall not engage in the business of guaranteeing the obligations of other persons other than issuing insured closing letters covering its agents in the normal course of business.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-307.
Single risk limitation.

The net retained liability of a title insurer for a single risk on property located in this state, whether assumed directly or as reinsurance, shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the sum of its total surplus to policyholders and reinsurance reserve, less the value assigned to title plants, as shown in the insurer’s most recent annual statement on file in the commissioner’s office.

The commissioner may waive the limitation of this section for a particular risk upon application of the insurer and for good cause shown.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-308.
Underwriting standards; record retention.

No title insurance policy as to property in this state shall be written unless it is based upon adequate evidence of the current condition of title certified in writing as of the date of the policy by a person duly authorized under W.S.

33-2-101

to act as a title abstractor in the county where the property is situated, or based upon the opinion of an attorney authorized to practice law in this state as to the condition of the title following a review by the attorney of pertinent title records or abstracts. Evidence of the examination of title and determination of insurability shall be preserved and retained in the files of the title insurer or its title agent for a period of not less than fifteen (15) years after the title insurance policy has been issued. Instead of retaining the original evidence, the title insurer or title agent, in the regular course of business, may establish a system whereby all or part of the evidence is recorded, copied or reproduced by any process that accurately and legibly reproduces or forms a durable medium for reproducing the contents of the original. This subsection does not apply to a title insurer:

Assuming liability through a contract of reinsurance; or

Acting as coinsurer if one (1) of the other coinsuring title insurers has complied with this section.

Except as allowed by regulations the commissioner promulgates, no title insurer or title agent shall knowingly issue any title insurance policy or commitment to insure without showing all outstanding, enforceable, recorded liens or other interests against the property, title to which is to be insured.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 460; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-460; W.S. 1977, §

26-28-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-309.
Reinsurance reserve.

A domestic title insurer shall establish and maintain a reinsurance reserve computed in accordance with this section, and all sums attributed to that reserve are considered and constitute unearned portions of the original premiums. This reserve shall be reported as a liability of the title insurer in its financial statements.

The reinsurance reserve shall be maintained by the title insurer for the protection of holders of title insurance policies. Except as provided in this section, assets equal in value to the reinsurance reserve are not subject to distribution among creditors or stockholders of the title insurer until all claims of policyholders or claims under reinsurance contracts have been paid in full, and all liability on the policies or reinsurance contracts has been paid in full and discharged or lawfully reinsured.

A foreign or alien title insurance company licensed to transact title insurance business in this state shall maintain at least the same reserves on title insurance policies issued on properties located in this state as are required of domestic title insurance companies, unless the laws of the jurisdiction of domicile of the foreign or alien title insurance company require a higher amount.

The reinsurance reserve shall consist of:

The amount of the reinsurance reserve on May 27, 1983; and

A sum equal to twenty cents ($.20) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) of net retained liability under each title insurance policy on a single risk written on properties located in this state written after May 27, 1983.

Amounts placed in the reinsurance reserve in any year in accordance with paragraph (d)(ii) of this section shall be deducted in determining the net profit of the title insurer for that year.

A title insurer shall release from the reinsurance reserve a sum equal to the appropriate amount as set forth in the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual. The amount of the reinsurance reserve or similar unearned premium reserve maintained before July 1, 2001, shall be released in accordance with the law in effect at the time such reserves became effective.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-23-310.
Use of reinsurance reserve on liquidation, dissolution or insolvency.

If a domestic title insurer becomes insolvent, is in the process of liquidation of dissolution or is in the commissioner’s possession:

The amount of the assets of the title insurance company equal to the reinsurance reserve then remaining may be used by or with the commissioner’s written approval to pay for reinsurance of the title insurer’s liability upon all outstanding title insurance policies or reinsurance agreements to the extent to which claims for losses by the holders thereof are not then pending. The balance of assets, if any, equal to the reinsurance reserve may then be transferred to the title insurer’s general assets;

The assets net of the reinsurance reserve shall be available to pay claims for losses sustained by holders of title insurance policies then pending or arising up to the time reinsurance is effected. If claims for losses exceed the title insurer’s other assets those claims, when established, shall be paid pro rata out of the surplus assets attributable to the reinsurance reserve, to the extent of the surplus, if any.

If reinsurance is not obtained, assets equal to the reinsurance reserve and assets constituting minimum capital, or so much as remains thereof after outstanding claims have been paid, constitute a trust fund to be held and invested by the commissioner for twenty (20) years, out of which claims of policyholders shall be paid as they arise. The balance, if any, of the trust fund, at the expiration of twenty (20) years, shall revert to the general assets of the title insurer.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-311.
Loss and loss expense reserve.

All title insurers licensed in this state shall establish and maintain reserves against unpaid losses and loss expenses.

Upon receiving notice from or on behalf of the insured of a title defect in or lien or adverse claim against the title of the insured that may result in a loss or cause expense to be incurred in the proper disposition of the claim, the title insurer shall determine the amount to be added to the reserve, which amount shall reflect a careful estimate of the loss or loss expense likely to result by reason of the claim.

Reserves required under this section may be revised from time to time and shall be redetermined at least once each year.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-312.
Reinsurance.

A title insurer may obtain reinsurance for all or any part of its liability under one (1) or more of its title insurance policies or reinsurance agreements and may also reinsure title insurance policies issued by other title insurers on risks located in this state or elsewhere. Reinsurance on policies issued on properties located in this state must be obtained from title insurers licensed to transact title insurance business in this state.

Upon application by a title insurer, the commissioner may permit the insurer to obtain reinsurance from a title insurer not licensed in this state if:

The title insurer is unable to obtain reinsurance from a title insurer licensed in this state; and

The capital and surplus of the unlicensed title insurer meet the requirements for licensed companies under this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-313.
Investments.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, the general investment provisions of chapter 7 of this code [title 26] apply to all domestic title insurers.

A domestic title insurer may invest and have invested funds in an amount not exceeding its surplus to policyholders or three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00), whichever is the larger sum, in title plants and equipment and in stocks of abstract companies.

Investment in plants, equipment and abstract company shares authorized by this section shall not be credited against the insurer’s required reinsurance reserves.

Any investment of a domestic title insurer acquired before May 27, 1983, and which, under this section, would be considered ineligible as an investment on that date shall be disposed of before May 27, 1985. The commissioner, upon application and proof that forced sale of any such investment would be contrary to the best interests of the title insurer or its policyholders, may extend the period for disposal of the investment for a reasonable time.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-314.
Conditions for providing escrow, closing or settlement services, or maintaining title indemnification accounts.

A title insurer or title agent may engage in the escrow, settlement, or closing business, or any combination of such businesses, and operate as an escrow, settlement, or closing agent, provided that:

Funds deposited in connection with any escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification shall be deposited in a separate fiduciary trust account or accounts in a bank or other financial institution insured by an agency of the federal government. These funds are the property of the person or persons entitled thereto under the provisions of the escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification and shall be segregated by escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification in the records of the title insurer or title agent. Those funds are not subject to any debts of the title insurer or title agent and shall be used only in accordance with the terms of the individual escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification under which the funds were accepted;

Interest received on funds deposited with the title insurer or title agent in connection with any escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification shall be paid to the depositing party unless the instructions provide otherwise;

The title insurer or title agent shall maintain separate records of all receipts and disbursements of escrow, settlement, closing or title indemnification funds.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-23-315.
Identification of title agents.

A title insurer shall provide to the commissioner on an annual basis a list of all of its title agents within this state.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-316.
Title agents; license required; requirements as to license.

No person shall act as a title agent unless licensed in accordance with this article.

No license shall be issued to, continued or permitted to exist for any person to act as a title agent unless the person:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a bona fide resident of and resides within this state or any other state which has entered into a reciprocal title agent licensing agreement with the commissioner;

Is appointed as a title agent by a title insurer, subject to the issuance of the title agent’s license;

Passes an examination given by the commissioner or any testing service selected by the commissioner covering the search and examination of title to real property, insurance principles relating to title insurance and the fiduciary duties and procedures of escrows, closings and settlements of real estate transactions.

Any person, other than a natural person, to whom a title insurance agent’s license is issued shall designate to the commissioner those natural persons who are or will be exercising the powers and performing the duties of the title insurance agent. The designated individuals are subject to paragraphs (b)(i) and (iii) of this section. Persons performing only clerical functions are not subject to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

Any person, other than a natural person, to whom a title insurance agent’s license is issued shall demonstrate that each natural person designated to exercise the powers and perform the duties of the title insurance agent meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-317.
Title agents; application for license.

Application for a license to act as a title agent shall be made in writing in the form and manner the commissioner prescribes. An application fee, as provided by W.S.

26-4-101

, shall be paid at the time of application.

The application is a continuing one, and any prospective licensee or licensees shall inform the commissioner promptly if any information set forth in the application changes or is no longer accurate, or if any other relevant information regarding the application arises after the original application.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “An application fee” for “A nonrefundable application fee” in the second sentence.

§ 26-23-318.
Title agents; issuance of license; expiration; renewal.

The commissioner shall issue a license to act as a title agent to any person if:

The prospective licensee files an application pursuant to W.S.

26-23-317

;

The prospective licensee meets the requirements of W.S.

26-23-316

; and

The prospective licensee provides the commissioner with evidence of financial responsibility in the form and in a minimum amount the commissioner requires by regulation.

Each individual title agent’s license expires on the last day of the month of the licensee’s birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license, and may be renewed if prior to the expiration of his license a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner, the continuation fee set forth in W.S.

26-4-101

is paid, continuing education requirements are met by the due date and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code. An individual title agent who allows the license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date.

Each title agent license issued to a business entity expires on the last day of the month in which the license was effective in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license and may be renewed if prior to the expiration of the license, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner, the continuation fee set forth in W.S.

26-4-101

is paid and the licensee remains in compliance with all other provisions of this code. A business entity title agent that allows the license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1; 2004, ch. 7, § 1; 2019 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), substituted “the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license” for “March 1 of each year.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (b), added "individual" after "Each", substituted "if" for "by the commissioner upon filing by the licensee,", "written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by" for ", of a properly completed renewal application in the form" and "the continuation fee set forth in" for ", prescribes, and upon payment of a renewal fee as provided by" and added "is paid, continuing education requirements are met by the due date and the licensee remains in compliance with all other applicable provisions of this code. An individual title agent who allows the license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written examination, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date."; added "(c) (c)
Each title agent license issued to a business entity expires on the last day of the month in which the license was
effective in the second year following the issuance or renewal of the license and may be renewed if prior to the expiration of the license, a written request for continuation of the license is made to the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner, the continuation fee set forth in W.S.

26-4-101

is paid and the licensee remains in compliance with all other provisions of this code. A business entity title agent that allows the license to lapse may, within twelve (12) months from the due date of the continuation fee, reinstate the same license, however, a penalty equal to the amount of the continuation fee shall be required in addition to the continuation fee for any continuation request received after the due date."

§ 26-23-319.
Title agents; records.

A title agent shall keep books of account and records and vouchers pertaining to any business transacted under this article. All records shall be maintained in a manner that the commissioner may readily ascertain from time to time whether the title agent has complied with all applicable provisions of this article.

The commissioner, at any time during normal business hours, may examine, audit and inspect books and records maintained by title agents under this article.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-320.
Title agents; report of claims.

A title agent shall immediately report every loss claim to the title insurer that issued the policy against which the claim is presented.

No title agent shall indemnify or pay the claim of any insured.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

§ 26-23-321.
Title agents; refusal, suspension or revocation of license; fine instead of suspension.

In addition to any other grounds stated in this article, the commissioner may refuse to license any person as a title agent, or may suspend a title agent’s license, after providing due notice and an opportunity to be heard, upon a finding that the person:

Fails to meet the qualifications for licensure under this code;

Has violated any provision of this code or any rule or regulation of the commissioner;

Has made a material misstatement in an application for a title insurance agent’s license or has obtained a title insurance agent’s license by fraud or willful misrepresentation;

Has misappropriated or converted to his own use funds belonging to applicants, insureds, title insurers, escrow participants or others;

Has intentionally misrepresented the terms of a title insurance policy to any applicant or policyholder or has misrepresented material facts to, concealed material facts from or made false statements to any party to an escrow, settlement or closing transaction;

Has in the conduct of his affairs under his title insurance agent’s license, used fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices or has shown himself to be incompetent, untrustworthy, financially irresponsible or a source of injury and loss to the public; or

Has aided, abetted or assisted another person in violating this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article.

The commissioner may revoke the title agent’s license of any person convicted by final judgment of a felony that relates to the title insurance profession or to the ability to practice as a title insurance agent.

In addition to or without imposing the penalties specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the commissioner may impose a fine in an amount not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each violation of this section or of any rule or regulation promulgated under this section.

Any of the penalties provided under this section may be imposed on a title agent other than a natural person for action of individuals designated by that insurance agent.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188,§ 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), added “that relates to the title insurance profession or to the ability to practice as a title insurance agent” at the end.

§ 26-23-322.
Rebates and inducements prohibited.

No title insurer or title agent shall:

Pay in any manner to any person any commission, any part of its premiums, fees or other charges or any other consideration as inducement or compensation for the referral of title business or for performance of any escrow or other service by the title insurer or title agent;

Issue any title insurance policy or perform any service in connection with any transaction in which it has paid or intends to pay any commission, rebate or inducement which it knows to be in violation of this section.

No person shall knowingly receive or accept in any manner, any commission, rebate or inducement referred to in subsection (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting reasonable payments, other than for the referral of title insurance business, for services actually rendered to either a title insurer or a title agent in connection with title insurance business.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurance anti-rebate statutes: validity and construction, 90 ALR4th 213.

§ 26-23-323.
Division of premiums and charges.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting the division of premiums and charges between or among a title insurer and its title agent, two (2) or more title insurers, one (1) or more title insurers and one (1) or more title agents or two (2) or more title agents, provided the division of premiums and charges does not constitute:

An unlawful rebate or inducement under this article; or

Payment of a forwarding fee or finder’s fee.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-23-324.
Favored title agent or insurer.

No producer or other person shall require in any manner as a condition, agreement or understanding to selling or furnishing any other person any loan or extension thereof, credit, sale, property, contract, lease or service, that such other person shall place any contract of title insurance of any kind through any particular title agent or title insurer. No title agent or title insurer shall knowingly participate in any such prohibited plan or transaction. No person shall fix a price charged for such thing or service, or discount from or rebate upon price, on the condition, agreement or understanding that any title insurance is to be obtained through a particular title agent or title insurer.

Any producer or other person who violates this section, or any title insurer or title agent who accepts an order for title insurance knowing that it is in violation of this section, in addition to any other action which may be taken by the regulatory authority having jurisdiction, is subject to a fine by the commissioner in an amount equal to five (5) times the premium for the title insurance.

The commissioner may invoke the aid of the courts in enforcing any fines imposed under this section.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 188, § 1.